Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5131
International development bank obligations.

An insurer may invest in obligations of an international development bank of which the United States is a member. Any investment authorized under this section shall have a minimum quality rating as described in subdivision (1) of section 44-5112. An insurer's investments authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty percent of its admitted assets.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 31;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 15.